Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.24
State Emergency Capital Construction Contingency Fund; created; investment.

There is hereby created for the use of the Department of Administrative Services a fund to be known as the State Emergency Capital Construction Contingency Fund, to consist of such money as shall be appropriated to such fund by the Legislature. Any money in such fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 117.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.